Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-1032
Firefighter; temporary disability; workers' compensation benefits; how treated.

No firefighter shall be entitled during any period of temporary disability to receive in full both his or her salary and his or her benefits under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act. All Nebraska workers' compensation benefits shall be payable in full to such firefighter as provided in the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, but all amounts paid by the city or its insurer under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act to any disabled firefighter entitled to receive a salary during such disability shall be considered as payments on account of such salary and shall be credited thereon. The remaining balance of such salary, if any, shall be payable as otherwise provided in sections 16-1020 to 16-1038.

Laws 1983, LB 531, § 13;

Laws 1985, LB 3, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 8.

Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.